Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-604.02
Digital-on-premises ticket, defined.

Digital-on-premises ticket means a digital ticket purchased in person on a mobile or other electronic device verified to be present at the location of the lottery operator or an authorized sales outlet location in accordance with subdivision (3)(b) of section 9-651.01.

Laws 2023, LB775, § 6.